Washington statutes.
RCW 43.07.125

Fees—Charitable trusts—Charitable solicitations.

The secretary of state may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW establishing reasonable fees for the following services rendered under chapter 11.110 or 19.09 RCW:

(1) Any service rendered in-person at the secretary of state's office;

(2) Any expedited service;

(3) The electronic transmittal of documents;

(4) The providing of information by microfiche or other reduced-format compilation;

(5) The handling of checks or drafts for which sufficient funds are not on deposit;

(6) The resubmission of documents previously submitted to the secretary of state where the documents have been returned to the submitter to make such documents conform to the requirements of the applicable statute;

(7) The handling of telephone requests for information; and

(8) Special search charges.

[ 1993 c 471 s 24; 1993 c 269 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 471: See RCW 19.09.915.

Effective date—1993 c 269: See note following RCW 23.86.070.